Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 1. Generally

Cross references. —

As to the community college endowment challenge fund, see article 11 of chapter 16 of this title.

As to an educational assistance plan for national guard members, see §

19-9-501

et seq.

§ 21-18-101.
Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Wyoming Community College System Code.”

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 217, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 21-471; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

21-3-201

; W.S. 1977, §

21-18-201

; Laws 1985, ch. 208, § 3; 2000, ch. 73, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Former §

21-18-101

was renumbered by Laws 1985, ch. 208, § 3, effective July 1, 1985. For present provision, see §

21-18-103

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 21-18-102(a)(xvi).

§ 21-18-102.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Academic program” means those programs approved by the commission which provide credits:

Resulting in a two (2) year associate degree;

Resulting in an applied baccalaureate degree;

Resulting in a credit bearing credential such as a certificate; or

Which may be transferred to an accredited four (4) year college or university.

“Administrative computing,” means hardware and software components that support data processing activities for daily business operations and provide support for management information systems. Administrative computing shall be distinct from academic computing operations that support instructional programs;

“Assessed value” means the total assessed value of any community college district;

“Biennial funding report” means the current funds estimated by each college to be expended in a biennial period. For purposes of this paragraph, “current funds” shall be as defined by the national association of college and university business officers;

“College system” means the community colleges and the community college commission established pursuant to this act;

“Commission” means the community college commission of Wyoming;

“Community college” means an institution established under this act;

“Community college district” means a body corporate established by statute as a subdivision of a county or counties that establishes or maintains a community college;

“Community service programs” means all programs, class activities and services sponsored by a college which are not for credit or part of an academic, vocational-technical or continuing education program;

“Continuing education programs” means those programs, class activities and services sponsored by a college which provide job skills necessary to remain in or advance as a member of the work force which do not result in degrees or certificates;

“Coordination” means to facilitate collaborative interaction among state government, the boards of the individual community colleges, the community college commission and other entities;

“Full-time equivalency” means the number of approved academic or vocational-technical credit hours for each class for which students are enrolled divided by twelve (12). In calculating full-time equivalency, the census date of student enrollment as audited by the commission shall be used;

“Governing board” or “board” means the community college district board;

“School district” means any school district established pursuant to the laws of this state excluding community colleges and community college districts;

“Vocational-technical programs” means those programs approved by the commission which provide job skills necessary to enter, remain in or advance as a member of the work force and result in degrees or certificates;

“Annual weighted average enrollment” means the total of three (3) consecutive academic years full-time weighted equivalency enrollment in which the most recent academic year is multiplied by one-half (.5) and the immediately preceding two (2) academic years are multiplied by one-quarter (.25);

“Distance education class” means a class in which the instructor and a majority of students are physically separated by time or space, and a communications source other than face to face in class instruction is used to provide synchronous or asynchronous instruction. A class which qualifies as a distance education class shall not be considered a level one, level two or level three class;

“Full-time weighted equivalency enrollment” means full-time equivalency with credit hours for each class assigned a weighting system as follows:

Each distance education class credit hour shall be multiplied by eight-tenths (.8);

Each level one class credit hour shall be multiplied by one (1);

Each level two class credit hour shall be multiplied by one and one-quarter (1.25);

Each level three class credit hour shall be multiplied by one and one-half (1.5).

“Level one class” means a class guided by an instructor through course material via classroom lecture, limited field trips, multimedia, text book reading, written assignments and one-on-one tutorial wherein students rely on the instructor to lead the class and assign appropriate homework and tests based on class lecture;

“Level two class” means a class taught in a laboratory setting, supplemented but not solely based on lecture, textbook reading, field trips, writing assignments and the use of multimedia;

“Level three class” means a class that is highly technical and requires significant ancillary equipment. Level three classes incorporate all methods of instruction with the primary emphasis of instruction centering on equipment and hands-on experiences;

“Standard budget base amount” means a base budget amount of one hundred ninety-four million seven hundred two thousand one hundred thirty-one dollars ($194,702,131.00) adjusted by all increases and decreases enacted pursuant to W.S. 21-18-203(e);

“This act” means W.S.

21-18-101

through

21-18-409

.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 217, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 21-472; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-3-202; W.S. 1977, §

21-18-202

; Laws 1985, ch. 208, § 3; 1989, ch. 248, § 2; 1991, ch. 228, § 2; 2000, ch. 33, § 1; ch. 73, § 1; 2016 ch. 87, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2018 ch. 136, § 2, effective July 1, 2018; 2019 ch. 176, § 2, effective March 8, 2019; 2019 ch. 199, § 1, effective March 15, 2019.

Effective Dates

Laws 2019, ch. 176 § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2019.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, inserted “In calculating full-time equivalency, the census date of student enrollment as audited by the commission shall be used” at the end of (a)(xii), added (a)(xvi) through (a)(xxii), and renumbered (a)(xvi) as (a)(xxiii).

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (a)(xxiii), substituted “through

21-18-319

” for “through

21-18-317

.”

The 2019 amendment,

in (a)(xxiii), substituted "W.S.

21-18-101

through

21-18-409

" for "W.S.

21-18-101

through

21-18-319

."

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Constitutional Law — A Narrow Reapportionment Holding with Broad Implications for Wyoming.Brown v. Thomson, 462 U.S. 835, 103 S. Ct. 2690, 77 L. Ed. 2d 214, 1983 U.S. LEXIS 78 (1983),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 253 (1984).

§ 21-18-103.
Transfer of property from existing to newly established community college district; indebtedness and obligations to pass to new college district.

Whenever a community college district is established and created and includes territory comprising a community college district already supporting and operating a community college, the board of trustees of the existing community college district shall immediately, by proper conveyance, transfer unto the new community college district all of the assets, both real and personal, used in the operation of, or in any manner connected with, the former college. The property shall become the property of the new college district and any and all indebtedness or obligations, in any manner created, in relation to the property so transferred shall automatically, by operation of law, become the indebtedness or obligations of the new college district as if originally created by action of the new college district.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 67, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 21-448.1; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

21-3-101

; W.S. 1977, §

21-18-101

; Laws 1985, ch. 208, § 3.

§ 21-18-104.
Small business development centers.

The small business development centers shall be operated by the University of Wyoming. The university shall specify the organizational structure of the network of centers in consultation with the Wyoming business council created by W.S.

9-12-103

. The university shall integrate the operations of the centers with the Wyoming business council to the fullest extent permitted by federal law.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 228, § 1; 1998, ch. 6, § 3.

§ 21-18-105.
Budget authority.

The community college commission shall include in its budget request funding for Wyoming public television.

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 20, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 33, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 178, § 2.

The central Wyoming community college district board shall oversee the operations of Wyoming public television. The board shall assist Wyoming public television to provide educational, cultural and informational programming to the residents of this state.

In addition to subsection (a) of this section, the community college commission shall administer and shall include in its budget request funding for the following programs:

Adult basic education program; and

High school equivalency certification program.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 228, § 1; 1995, ch. 20, § 2; 1997, ch. 178, § 2; 2000, ch. 33, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 152, § 1; 2006, ch. 11, § 1; 2013 ch. 25, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, added (c).

The 2013 amendment,

substituted “high school equivalency certification” for “general educational development” in (c)(ii).

Laws 2013, ch. 25, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo Const. Approved February 14, 2013.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2006, ch. 11, § 3, effective July 1, 2006, provides: “The adult basic education program and the general educational development program shall be transferred from the department of workforce services to the community college commission. All positions, property and appropriated funds associated with these programs shall be transferred from the department to the commission. In addition, all rules and regulations promulgated by the department pertaining to both programs shall remain in effect and unaltered as rules and regulations of the commission until amended or repealed by the commission.”